Vermont statutes. TITLE 10A Vermont Fish and Wildlife Regulations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions
§ 11.
Falconry.

Purpose.

This rule is adopted pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4278
. In adopting this rule, the Commissioner establishes specific requirements for ensuring that holders of falconry permits are qualified and that the birds they possess are legally acquired and appropriately
cared for. This regulation defines required raptor housing facilities and falconry equipment, legal means of taking, lawful species, ages and numbers of raptors that may be taken and possessed, banding requirements, and other
restrictions on the practice of falconry.

Definitions.

“Apprentice” permittee means a person meeting the requirements of 5(a) of this rule.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Vermont Department of Fish and Wildlife or his/her designee.

“Department” means the Vermont Department of Fish and Wildlife.

“Permit” means a written authorization issued by the Department to take and possess raptors and to practice the sport of falconry issued pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4278(b)
.

“Falconry” means the sport of hunting by use of trained raptors, including the training, feeding and handling of such raptors and their recapture after being released for hunting or training.

“Falconer” means a person who possesses a raptor for the purposes of Falconry under this rule.

“General” permittee means a person meeting the requirements of 5(b) of this rule.

“Master” permittee means a person meeting the requirements of 5(c) of this rule.

“Passage Bird” means a wild bird less than one year old.

“Raptor” means all species and hybrids of the orders Strigiformes (owls) and Falconiformes (hawks and falcons), and Accipitriformes (hawks, eagles, and kites).

“Sponsor” means a General or Master Falconer, currently permitted by Vermont, or another state, who has agreed to advise and train a holder of an Apprentice permit.

“USFWS” means U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.

Application Requirements Qualifications for Appointment.

An applicant for a falconry permit must:

be at least sixteen (16) years old and a resident of Vermont;

not have a license under revocation for violation Title 10, Part 4.

submit to the Department, on a form prepared and furnished by the Department, an application for a falconry permit, to include:

(1)
the applicant’s name, address, telephone number, and date of birth and the location of his or her raptor housing facilities;

(2)
the number of raptors the applicant possesses at the time the application is submitted, including the species, age (if known), sex (if known), date of acquisition, and source of each;

(3)
the class of permit requested, including the name, address, and signature of sponsor, if required;

a listing of falconry permits previously held by the applicant;

an account of the applicant’s experience and training in falconry;

an original, certification by the applicant concerning the validity of the information, or the signature of a parent or guardian if the applicant is under the age of eighteen (18) years;

(4)
complete a supervised written examination on basic biology, care, and handling of raptors. The examination shall be given by the Department at a state-approved site. Successful completion requires
a minimum score of eighty five (85) percent. An applicant who fails the exam may retake it no sooner than sixty (60) days; and

(5)
submit to the Department a permit fee in accordance with Section 4(a).

The Commissioner may issue a permit to an applicant who meets the requirements of this rule.

Permit Terms.

Term of permit. A Vermont falconry permit is issued for three (3) years, unless amended or revoked. A permitted Apprentice or General Falconer may apply for a permit of higher class while possessing an unexpired permit without paying additional fees.

Compliance. Permittees shall comply with all terms under this regulation and all terms under federal falconry standards issued by the USFWS, including proper filing of electronic federal Migratory Bird Acquisition and Disposition Reports (Form 3—186A).
A copy of each federal report shall be submitted to the Department.

Revocation of permit.

The Commissioner may revoke a permit and seize raptors held under the permit if the Commissioner finds that the permittee:

failed to properly and humanely care for the raptors held under the permit;

allowed the raptors held under the permit to become a public nuisance;

failed to comply with any of the terms or conditions of the falconry permit.

Raptors seized under this section shall be released to the wild, transferred to another permittee, or disposed of as directed by the Commissioner.

Classes of Permits.

Permits shall be issued in three classes based upon the age and experience of the applicant.

Apprentice. Holders of an Apprentice permit shall:

be at least sixteen (16) years old;

obtain a sponsor who will consent to train and advise the permittee for a minimum of twenty (20) hours annually for the first two (2) years;

notify the Department in writing within ten (10) days after his or her sponsorship has been withdrawn for any reason, and notify the Department within ten (10) days of obtaining a new sponsor.

find a sponsor within ninety (90) days following the withdrawal of a previous sponsor. If an Apprentice fails to obtain a new sponsor and notify the Department within ninety (90) days, the Apprentice will surrender any raptors possessed under this rule
to the Department.

General. Holders of a General permit shall:

be at least eighteen (18) years old;

have a minimum of two (2) years experience in the practice of falconry at the Apprentice level or its equivalent, including maintaining, training, flying, and hunting the raptor(s) for at least 4 months in each year, to be verified in writing by a sponsor
of the applicant who also recommends applicant for a permit; or verified by a state agency that has previously issued a permit to the applicant; or by other proof deemed appropriate by the Commissioner.

Master. Holders of a Master permit shall:

have a minimum or five (5) years experience in the practice of falconry at the General class level or its equivalent, to be verified by the State agency that has previously issued a permit to the applicant, or by other proof deemed appropriate by the
Commissioner.

Sponsor. A General permittee shall sponsor no more than one (1) Apprentice permittee at a time. A Master permittee shall sponsor no more than two (2) Apprentice permittees at a time.

Out of State Permits. Upon moving to Vermont, any falconer who holds a valid falconry permit from another state may use that state’s permit for a period of no more than six (6) months when applying for a Vermont falconry permit. After six months, the
person must have a Vermont falconry permit in order to engage in falconry in Vermont.

Facilities and Care.

Facilities. Prior to acquiring a raptor, the permittee shall possess or have access to suitable raptor housing facilities that have passed inspection by the Department. The facilities shall provide for protection from the environment, predators, and
undue disturbance and shall include the following:

Indoor facilities (mews) shall be large enough to allow easy access for caring for the raptors housed in the facility.

If more than one (1) raptor is to be kept in a mews, the raptors shall be tethered or separated by partitions and the area for each bird shall be large enough to allow the bird to fully extend its wings.

There shall be at least one (1) window, protected on the inside by vertical bars, spaced narrower than the width of the bird’s body, and a secure door that can be easily closed.

The floor of the mews shall permit easy cleaning and be well drained.

Suitable perches, of sufficient diameter and space for injury-free landings and take-offs, shall be provided.

An outdoor facility, or (weathering area) shall be fenced and covered with netting or wire, or roofed to protect the bird or birds from disturbance and attack by predators, except that perches more than 6 1/2 feet high need not be covered or roofed.

The enclosed areas shall be large enough to insure the birds cannot strike the fence when flying from the perch.

Protection from excessive sun, wind, and inclement weather shall be provided for each bird.

The enclosure must contain suitable perches for the species housed there.

Alternative housing is allowable so long as it is more protective of animal health and welfare than those specified above.

Equipment. Prior to acquiring a raptor, the permittee shall have suitable equipment that has passed inspection by the Department. The permittee shall have the following equipment in his or her possession:

Jesses. At least two (2) pairs of Aylmeri jesses or similar type constructed of pliable, high-quality leather or suitable synthetic material to be used when any raptor is flown free. Traditional one-piece jesses may be used on raptors when not being
flown free.

Leashes and swivels. At least two (2) leashes and two (2) strong swivels of acceptable falconry design.

Bath container. At least one (1) suitable container for each raptor, two (2) to six (6) inches deep and wider than the length of the raptor, for drinking and bathing.

Outdoor perches. At least one (1) weathering area perch of an acceptable design for each raptor.

Weighing device. A reliable scale or balance suitable for weighing the raptor(s) held, and graduated to increments of not more than one (1) gram.

Maintenance. All facilities and equipment shall be kept at or above the preceding standards at all times.

Food. Adequate food shall be provided at appropriate intervals for each raptor according to its age and condition. Adequate food shall mean sufficient quantity and nutritional value to maintain a normal body weight and healthy physiological function.
All foods shall be served in a clean and sanitary manner.

Medical care. The permittee shall provide the Department with a written statement from a veterinarian stating his/her qualifications and a willingness to work with raptors on an ongoing basis prior to the permittee’s possession of a raptor.

Transportation and temporary holding. A raptor may be transported or held in temporary facilities comparable to those required for permanent housing (including but not limited to adequate perching, bathing and protection from natural elements) for a
period not to exceed thirty (30) days.

Inspection. Permitees and applicants shall allow the Department to inspect their facilities, equipment, and raptors for compliance with permit standards. An inspection may be made at reasonable hours of the day with seventy two (72) hours notice. The
notice requirement is waived when there are grounds to believe that the standards set forth in this rule are not being met.

Capture of Wild Raptors for Falconry.

Capture. Only passage (hatching year) Red-tailed Hawks (Buteo jamaicensis) and Goshawks (Accipiter gentili) may be captured for falconry. Nestlings (eyass) and adult birds may not be taken for falconry.

The raptors may be captured from 1 September through 25 January, inclusive.

The permittee may use traps, nets and other legal methods of raptor capture that do not cause injury or lethal stress. It is illegal to use steel-jawed traps, gins, pole traps or jump traps.

Each capture device shall be identified legibly with an attached tag bearing the permittee’s name and address.

Each deployed capture device shall be inspected at least once each calendar day.

Any raptor not retained for falconry shall be immediately released.

An Apprentice permittee may not possess more than one (1) raptor and may not obtain more than one (1) raptor for replacement from all sources during any twelve (12) month period calculated from the first day of possession of the first raptor. An apprentice
may temporarily possess the raptors of the apprentice’s sponsor.

A General permittee may not possess more than two (2) raptors and may not obtain more than two (2) raptors for replacement from all sources during any twelve (12) month period calculated from the first day of possession of the first raptor.

A Master permittee may not possess more than three (3) raptors and may not obtain more than two (2) raptors taken from the wild during any twelve (12) month period calculated from the first day of possession of the first raptor. A Master permittee may
obtain no more than three (3) raptors from all sources during any twelve (12) month period calculated from the first day of possession of the first raptor.

Landowner permission. Prior to attempting to capture a raptor, a permittee shall obtain permission from the owner of private property on which the activity will occur.

Land closure. The Commissioner may close any area of the State to the taking of raptors.

Recapture of escaped raptors. A permittee may recapture an escaped raptor that was legally acquired and held. The bird may be recaptured by legal means at any time by a permitted falconer to be returned to the falconer who last possessed the escaped
bird.

Species and Possession Limits.

Permit class restrictions.

Species Restrictions.

An apprentice permittee may only possess Red-tailed Hawk taken from the wild as a passage bird. The Apprentice may capture a Red-tailed Hawk only under the supervision of the sponsor.

General or Master permittees may take and possess raptors according to the following limitations:

A Master permittee may only take passage Red-tailed Hawks and Goshawks from the wild.

A General permittee may take only passage Red-tailed Hawks from the wild.

A Master or General permittee may petition the Commissioner for authorization to capture a passage bird of another species.

Provided that possession is allowed in accordance with state and federal law, a General or Master permittee may possess a captive-bred bird, born and raised beyond two (2) weeks in captivity. The permittee shall keep complete and accurate records of all
transactions conducted under this clause, including the name, address, and permit number of the transferee; the day, month, and year of the transaction or disposition; the sale price or other consideration involved
in the transaction or disposition; and the species, sex, age, origin, and pedigree (lineage) of the raptor or raptors involved.

Raptors taken for other purposes. Raptors of any age captured under depredation or special use permits, or seized under Section 4(c) may be acquired by a General or Master permittee. Such raptors are counted as part of the permittee’s possession limit.

All raptors possessed under this rule shall be banded with readily identifiable bands. Goshawks shall be banded with non-reusable bands.

Importation, Exportation, Seizure, Sale, Trade and Release of Raptors.

Importation. Raptors brought into Vermont may be imported only under the authority of an importation permit from the Commissioner to a permitted falconer in accordance with 10 V.S.A. § 4709.

Importation permits shall not be issued for the possession of species that are specifically prohibited by these regulations, by laws of the exporting state, the laws of the State of Vermont, or by regulations of the federal government.

A nonresident falconer may temporarily bring raptor(s) he or she legally possesses into Vermont.

Exportation. Raptors taken in Vermont shall not be permanently transferred or exported to another state without written authorization from the Commissioner.

Seizure. The Commissioner may seize a raptor if the person in possession of the raptor does not have a valid permit as required by these rules.

Sale of raptors. Pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4902
, a permittee may not sell, purchase, barter, or offer to sell, purchase or barter any raptor taken from the wild.

Transfer. A permittee may transfer a legally-held raptor to another permittee according to the restrictions in Section 9, including the electronic filing of the federal form 3-186A.

Release, Transfer or Euthanization.

A wild falconry raptor captured in Vermont that can survive for an extended period in the wild may be intentionally released in Vermont. Prior to release, any non-federal band shall be removed and surrendered to the Department, and a standard federal
bird band shall be attached to the bird by the Department or a federally-permitted bird bander.

With the written authorization of the Commissioner, a wild falconry raptor captured in Vermont that is incapable of surviving for an extended period in the wild may:

be transferred to an approved educational facility, or to a breeding or rearing facility that holds a scientific collection permit for the species.

be transferred to a licensed wildlife rehabilitator.

upon a veterinarian’s recommendation a raptor may be euthanized in a manner that minimizes pain and stress, and the carcass disposed of either by donation to a public scientific or educational organization permitted to receive wild animals, or by burial
or incineration. Notice of euthanization of any raptor possessed under this rule shall be provided the Commissioner within ninety six (96) hours.

Captive-bred birds shall not be released into the wild.

Reporting Requirements.

Upon the loss or addition of any raptor held under a falconry permit, the falconer shall report such a loss or addition by filing form 3-186A within five (5) days of any such transaction. Such losses or additions shall include any takings, purchases,
deaths, transfers, and dispositions of raptors held under a permit.

A raptor possessed under authority of a falconry permit may be temporarily held by a person other than the permittee if that person is otherwise authorized to possess raptors, and if the raptor is accompanied at all times by a copy of the properly completed
form 3-186A (Migratory Bird Acquisition/Disposition Report) designating the permittee as the possessor of record, and by a signed, dated statement from the permittee authorizing the temporary possession.

Hunting with Raptors.

Any resident hunting with a raptor in Vermont must possess a valid falconry permit and a valid Vermont hunting or combination fishing and hunting license.

Any nonresident hunting with a raptor in Vermont must possess a valid falconry permit from his or her state of residence and a valid Vermont non-resident hunting or combination fishing and hunting license.

A falconry permittee must possess both valid Vermont and federal Migratory Waterfowl Hunting stamps before hunting migratory waterfowl.

A falconry permittee hunting ducks, coots, geese, brant, swans, doves, woodcock, rails, snipe, sandhill cranes, or gallinules must be registered with the Harvest Information Program (HIP).

A falconer whose raptor kills wildlife that is out of season or the taking of which is otherwise prohibited shall leave the dead wildlife where it lies, except that the raptor may feed upon the wildlife prior to leaving the site of the kill. The permittee
shall report the kill to a Vermont State Game Warden within twenty four (24) hours.

HISTORY:
Added 1995, Fish and Wildlife Commissioner’s Reg. No. 1006, eff. Aug. 27, 1994; 2013, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. eff. January 1, 2014.

§ 12.
Leashed tracking dogs.

Definitions.

For the purposes of this rule:

“Department” means the Vermont Department of Fish and Wildlife.

“Leashed tracking dog” means a dog which is used to track and find dead, injured, or wounded big game pursuant to a license issued in accordance with this rule. The dog must be licensed as required by subchapter 2 of chapter 193 of Title 20.

“Licensed” means a leashed tracking dog certificate issued pursuant to this rule, authorizing use of leashed tracking dogs as specified in this rule.

“Licensee” means a person who is the holder of a leashed tracking dog license.

“Physically incapacitated” means incapable of participating in the hunt due to physical injury.

“Dispatch” means to humanely kill.

“Big game animal” means deer and bear only.

Prohibition.

Except as permitted by

10 V.S.A. § 4701
and section 4 of this rule, no person may use a dog to track dead, wounded or injured big game. Law enforcement officials acting in the performance of their official duties are exempt from the provisions of
this rule.

Leashed Tracking Dog License.

A leashed tracking dog license issued by the Department entitles the licensee to:

Use leashed tracking dogs, during the day or at night to track and find dead, wounded or injured big game during all big game seasons and the 24 hour period immediately following the last day of a big game season.

Dispatch wounded or injured big game animals which have been tracked and found in accordance with and pursuant to the conditions of such license.

Temporarily possess a big game animal which has been dispatched by the licensee, or reduced to possession by the licensee, until lawfully tagged or until delivered to a State Game Warden pursuant to the conditions of the license.

Leashed Tracking Dog License; Conditions.

A big game hunter who has killed, wounded or injured, or reasonably believes he or she has killed, wounded or injured, a big game animal during a big game season may engage a licensee to track and recover the animal. If the hunter is physically incapacitated,
the licensee may track and dispatch the animal if the licensee is personally carrying a written signed instrument from the hunter listing (1) the date, (2) the hunter’s name, address, telephone number and big game license number,
and (3) a statement that the hunter has engaged the licensee to track the animal, and that the hunter has killed, wounded or injured such animal, and that the hunter is unable to accompany the licensee because of physical incapacitation.

No person other than the licensee or, during legal hunting periods, the big game hunter who has engaged the licensee when specifically so authorized by the licensee, may carry a firearm or bow of any description while tracking dead, wounded or injured
big game pursuant to this rule.

During legal hunting periods, the hunter who has engaged the licensee must dispatch the wounded or injured big game animal when found by the licensee by means which are lawful during the season in which it was wounded or injured and in a lawful manner
reduce the animal to legal possession. However, the licensee must dispatch the wounded or injured animal if the legal hunting period has ended, when the hunter is not present, or, when in the judgment of the licensee it is unsafe
or otherwise inappropriate for the hunter to do so.

The licensee may use a handgun of no less than .35 caliber with a barrel length of not less than four inches to dispatch a wounded or injured big game animal, and during the 24 hour period immediately following the last day of a big game season, provided
that the licensee complies with all other provisions of federal, state and local laws and regulations concerning possession and discharge of firearms and the conditions of a license granted under this rule.

Before tracking a dead, wounded or injured animal, the licensee must notify, by telephone or in person, the State Game Warden assigned to the area. If the warden is unavailable, his or her immediate supervisor will be notified. Notification must include
the 1) name of the licensee, 2) name, address, telephone number, and big game license number of the big game hunter engaging the licensee, 3) general location of the wounded or injured animal, and 4) the name of the owner(s) of
the land where the search will be conducted.

The licensee must maintain physical control of the leashed tracking dog(s) at all times while conducting activities subject to this rule by means of a lead attached to the dog’s collar or harness. This lead must be at least twelve (12) feet in length.

After a big game animal has been dispatched, the licensed hunter must immediately tag the carcass as required by Section 2a of part 4 Title 10 Appendix. If the hunter is physically incapacitated, the hunter must immediately tag the carcass upon delivery
of the animal by the licensee. If the hunter is unavailable the licensee must report the incident to and deliver the animal to a State Game Warden or the State Game Warden’s immediate supervisor.

The licensee must personally carry a current big game license and a valid leashed tracking dog license when conducting activities pursuant to this rule.

The licensee must notify the department in writing, of any change of address within 30 days of that change of address.

The licensee must submit to the department a written request for license renewal within the 30 days prior to the expiration of such license.

The licensee must submit an annual report to the Commissioner within 15 days of the close of the last yearly big game season, which shall give all dates, locations and outcomes of tracking incidents as well as the name, address and hunting license number
of each hunter and name of each State Game Warden contacted in each case.

Leashed Tracking Dog License Qualifications.

The applicant for a license must:

Provide proof of possession of a current Vermont big game hunting license;

Not have been convicted of, or pled guilty to, an offense under the Fish and Wildlife Law, within the previous five years which resulted in a revocation of the person’s big game, hunting, or archery license;

Submit a non-refundable application fee of $25.00 and a completed application to the Department prior to taking the written examination;

Receive a grade of 80 percent or higher on a written examination administered by the department. The examination will be offered at least once a year and will test the applicant’s knowledge of Fish and Wildlife law and regulations, dog training and handling
methods and other areas of knowledge as deemed appropriate or relevant by the Commissioner.

Leashed Tracking Dog License; Issuance.

Applicants and licensees shall pay the following fees:

Initial license—resident—$100

Renewal—resident—$125.00

Click to view

Click to view

A license is valid for five years from the date of issuance.

A license is valid only for the individual identified on the license and is not transferable.

A licensee who fails to renew his/her license within one year of the date of expiration must reapply and meet all the qualifications set forth in Section 5 of this rule.

The Department may place special conditions on the license which it deems appropriate or necessary. The Department may also waive or dispense with any requirement of this rule when the Department deems it to be in the public interest to do so.

Leashed Tracking Dog License; Suspension Or Revocation.

A license issued pursuant to this rule shall be revoked concurrently with all other licenses upon conviction of a violation of Vermont Fish and Wildlife law pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4502
.

non-resident—$200

non-resident—$225.00

HISTORY:
Added 1996, Fish and Wildlife Commissioner’s Reg. No. 1015, eff. Sept. 5, 1996.

§ 13.
Regulations for operating regulated shooting grounds.

A regulated shooting ground shall be at least 200 acres in area, on lands that the Commissioner deems suitable for the purpose. The land shall be enclosed as prescribed in

10 V.S.A. § 5218
, and the notices prescribed therein shall contain the words: “Regulated Private Shooting Ground, Special Regulations in Effect.” The permittee may further include notice of such restrictions as they may desire as
to trespassing. Such notices shall not be less than 18 inches long by one foot wide.

Permits will be issued to operate a regulated shooting ground for the following species only: mallard ducks, pheasant, quail, chukar partridge, and Hungarian partridge.

All birds released on regulated shooting grounds shall be at least 10 weeks old when released and raised on the premises, legally acquired from licensed breeders, or imported as provided in

10 V.S.A. § 4709
.

The permittee shall keep a current record of the birds taken, which shall include the name and address of the person taking such birds, their hunting license number, the kind and number of birds taken, and the date of taking. Each hunter will receive
a signed and dated receipt from the permittee showing the number and species of birds in possession.

The open season for taking game birds under these regulations shall be from January 1st to December 31st, both dates inclusive.

Annually within 40 days of the end of such season, the permittee shall file with the Fish and Wildlife Department a notarized report of the number and species of birds released, name of the breeder from which they were acquired, date released and the
records as provided in paragraph 4.

Except as specially provided in this regulation, all laws and fish and wildlife regulations shall be in effect on regulated shooting grounds.

HISTORY:
Added 1964, Fish and Game Commissioner’s Reg. No. 690, eff. May 30, 1964; 1984, Fish and Game Commissioner’s Reg. No. 690, eff. March 17, 1984; 1990, Fish and Wildlife Commissioner’s Reg. No. 690, eff. Jan. 5, 1991.

§ 14.
Posting against hunting, fishing or trapping.

Pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 5201(b)
the Fish & Wildlife Commissioner specifies that signs prohibiting the taking of fish or wild animals on land posted against such activity by the person or persons having the exclusive hunting, fishing and trapping
rights thereto shall:

be not less than 8 1/2" x 11";

have lettering and background of contrasting colors;

state that hunting, fishing or trapping or any combination of the three are prohibited or forbidden;

be dated each year;

be erected on or near the boundaries of the posted land or waters, not more than 400 feet apart, and at each corner of the boundaries of posted land;

be annually recorded at the town clerk’s office in the town where the posted land or waters is located, on a form provided by the Fish & Wildlife Commissioner, with a copy retained and a copy provided to the Commissioner; and

shall not be considered void if other language is added to the sign that is not covered by section 5201, as long as a reasonable person would understand that hunting, fishing or trapping are prohibited or forbidden.

Pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 5201(b)
, signs restricting the taking of fish or wild animals on land “by permission only” by the person or persons having the exclusive hunting, fishing and trapping rights thereto shall:

be not less than 8 1/2" x 11";

have lettering and background of contrasting colors;

state that hunting, fishing, or trapping or any combination of the three is by “permission only”;

be dated each year;

state the landowner’s name and a method by which to contact the property owner or person authorized to provide permission to hunt on the property;

be erected on or near the posted land or waters, not more than 400 feet apart and at each corner of the boundaries of posted land;

be annually recorded at the town clerk’s office in the town where the posted land or waters are located, on a form provided by the Fish & Wildlife Commissioner, with a copy retained and a copy provided to the Commissioner; and

shall not be considered void if other language is added that is not expressly required by Section 5201, as long as a reasonable person would understand that hunting, fishing or trapping are prohibited or forbidden.

Pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 5201(b)
signs prohibiting the taking of fish shall also include the date the waters were last stocked, and shall be erected on or near the shores of the waters. To legally post a river or stream against fishing under Section
5201, the numbers of fish stocked must meet or exceed those specified in Section 5202. A stocking affidavit must also be filed with the Fish and Wildlife Commissioner and the town clerk of the town where stocked.

HISTORY:
Added 1968, Fish and Game Commissioner’s Reg. No. 762, eff. April 24, 1968; amended 1996, Fish and Wildlife Commissioner’s Reg. No. 762, eff. Sept. 5, 1996; 2014, Regulation of the Secretary of Natural Resources, eff. Jan.
1, 2015.